Utah statutes.
78B-6-1241.   Equalization.

(1)  If a partition cannot be made equally among the parties according to their respective rights without prejudice to the rights and interests of some of them, and a partition is ordered, the courts may order compensation made by one party to another on account of the inequality.

(2)  Compensation may not be required to be made to others by unknown owners or a minor, unless the court determines that the minor has sufficient personal property to make the payment and the minor's and the minor's interest will not be negatively affected.

(3)  The court has the power in all cases to make compensatory adjustment among the parties according to the principles of equity.

